Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Chapter 19

Energy Conservation Code

13-19-101. Model Energy Code — Adoption.

The Model Energy Code, 1992 Edition, for energy conservation in new building construction, published by the Council of American Building Officials, is hereby adopted by reference as the minimum requirements for the effective use of energy in new buildings. Notwithstanding the first sentence of this section, local jurisdictions shall have the option of adopting the 2000 International Energy Conservation Code with 2002 amendments, published by the International Code Council, as the minimum requirements for the effective use of energy in new buildings in that jurisdiction. However, any revisions or amendments to the above referenced codes shall become effective only upon approval by the general assembly or upon approval by the appropriate committee of the general assembly.

Acts 1978, ch. 888, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-2501; Acts 1993, ch. 193, § 1; 1994, ch. 977, § 1; 2003, ch. 329, § 1.

13-19-102. Application — Utilization of solar hot water heating systems.

The state code for energy conservation established by this chapter shall govern the design and construction of new buildings and structures or portions thereof and additions to existing buildings that provide facilities or shelter for public assembly, educational, business, mercantile, institutional, storage, and residential occupancies, as well as those portions of factory and industrial occupancies designed primarily for human occupancy by regulating their exterior envelopes and the selection of their heating, ventilating and air conditioning systems, service water heating, electrical distribution and illuminating systems and equipment for effective use of energy.

The state building commission shall utilize solar hot water heating systems if cost-efficient over the term of the bonds in any projects that involve conventional hot water systems.

Acts 1978, ch. 888, § 2; 1979, ch. 403, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-2502.

Compiler's Notes. The last sentence of § 2 of Acts 1978, ch. 888, which read:

“The code shall not apply to structures occupied exclusively as dwellings for residence purposes by one or two families; outbuildings, such as barns and other farm buildings; and one-story buildings, not exceeding two thousand five hundred (2,500) square feet, which are used for commercial purposes of a non-hazardous nature.”,

was not codified in view of House Joint Resolution No. 565 which is set out following chapter 888 in the 1978 Public Acts and which was adopted April 27, 1978 and approved May 8, 1978, providing:

“Whereas, the initial enrollment of chapter 888 of the public acts of 1978 has revealed that certain language has been duplicated creating conflicting exemptions; and

“Whereas, it was the intent of the general assembly with the adoption of committee amendment 1 to remove the exemptions in section 2 and to list the exemptions in section 3, although reasonable minds could differ on the interpretation of the directory language; and

“Whereas, it is incumbent on this body to enact statutes whose meanings are clear so that citizens may comply with laws and be secure in their interpretation; now, therefore,

“Be it Resolved by the House of Representatives of the Ninetieth General Assembly of the State of Tennessee, the Senate Concurring, that the secretary of state is hereby requested to remove the last sentence of section 2 of house bill no. 2338 which was initially enrolled as chapter 888 of the public acts of 1978.

“Be it Further Resolved, that copies of this resolution be sent to the secretary of state, the house engrossing clerk and the executive secretary of the code commission.”

13-19-103. Exemptions.

Buildings are exempt from this code as follows:

All nonresidential farm buildings;

All temporary buildings used exclusively for construction purposes;

Other buildings as specifically exempted by § 103.3 of the Model Energy Code, 1992 Edition or as specifically exempted by § 101.4.1 of the 2000 International Energy Conservation Code with 2002 amendments in jurisdictions that have adopted the 2000 International Energy Conservation Code with 2002 amendments pursuant to § 13-19-101; and

Additions to one-family and two-family dwellings which:

Are less than ten percent (10%) of the square footage of the dwelling; and

Have more than fifty percent (50%) of the total outside wall and roof space composed of glass.

Acts 1978, ch. 888, § 3; T.C.A., § 13-2503; Acts 1993, ch. 193, § 2; 1994, ch. 977, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 329, § 2.

13-19-104. Amendment to code.

Section 104.1 of the Model Energy Code, 1992 Edition shall be amended by deleting the period at the end of the section and replacing it with a semicolon followed by these words “however, the building official may not require submission of plans prepared by a licensed engineer or architect in the case of plans for single family dwellings and duplexes.”

Acts 1978, ch. 888, § 4; T.C.A., § 13-2504; Acts 1993, ch. 193, § 3; 1994, ch. 977, § 1.

13-19-105. Enforcement.

It is the responsibility of every city, county, town, municipal corporation, and metropolitan government to enforce this chapter. It is the responsibility of the state building commission and its staff to enforce this chapter as to any buildings designed or constructed, regardless of location, under its supervision, in accordance with § 4-15-106.

Acts 1978, ch. 888, § 5; 1979, ch. 403, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-2505.

13-19-106. Adoption by local governments.

Each local government shall adopt the state code for energy conservation in new building construction with any amendments it deems reasonably necessary to accommodate local conditions. If the standards adopted by local governments are equal to or stricter than the code, the local standards shall control. If the local standards are less strict than the code standards, the code standards shall control.

Acts 1978, ch. 888, § 6; T.C.A., § 13-2506.

13-19-107. Fees.

Local governments may charge a reasonable fee for each permit, to offset the costs of administration, inspection, and enforcement of the code, as local government sees fit. The fee may not accrue to the general revenue of the local government or by any other application become subject to laws regulating local taxation.

Acts 1978, ch. 888, § 7; T.C.A., § 13-2507.

13-19-108. Adoption of department of housing and urban development methods and practice.

Any worksheets, prescriptive methods, alternative methods or practices concerning the Model Energy Code compliance or the 2000 International Energy Conservation Code with 2002 amendments compliance deemed acceptable by the department of housing and urban development shall be acceptable in this state.

Acts 1994, ch. 977, § 3; 2003, ch. 329, § 3.